zh-CN: 板型尺寸分类: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; 自定义; 青少年款 2 ft × 1.5 ft (24 in × 18 in); 迷你桌面款 (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); 标准款 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); 车尾派对款 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); 旅行款 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); 其他
ja: ボードサイズ分類: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; カスタム; ジュニア 2 ft × 1.5 ft（24 in × 18 in）; ミニ卓上（4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in）; レギュレーション 2 ft × 4 ft（24 in × 48 in）; テールゲート 2 ft × 3 ft（24 in × 36 in）; トラベル 1 ft × 2 ft（12 in × 24 in）; その他
sv: Klassificering av brädstorlek: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Anpassad; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Bordsmodell, mini (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Standard 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Bagagelucka 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Reseformat 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Annan
ko: 보드 크기 분류: 120cm × 60cm; 90cm × 60cm; 맞춤형; 주니어 2ft × 1.5ft(24in × 18in); 미니 테이블탑(4in × 8in – 10in × 12in); 규정 2ft × 4ft(24in × 48in); 테일게이트 2ft × 3ft(24in × 36in); 여행용 1ft × 2ft(12in × 24in); 기타
nb: Klassifisering av brettstørrelse: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Tilpasset; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini-bordplate (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Standard 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Bakluke 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Reise 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Annet
ru: Классификация размеров досок: 120 см × 60 см; 90 см × 60 см; Индивидуальный; Детский 2 × 1,5 фута (24 × 18 дюймов); Настольный мини (4 × 8 – 10 × 12 дюймов); Стандартный 2 × 4 фута (24 × 48 дюймов); Тейлгейт 2 × 3 фута (24 × 36 дюймов); Дорожный 1 × 2 фута (12 × 24 дюйма); Другое
hr-HR: Klasifikacija veličine ploče: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Prilagođeno; Junior, 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini stolna, (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Standardna, 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate, 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Putna, 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Ostalo
fi: Laudan kannen kokoluokitus: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Mukautettu; Juniori 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Pöytämalli, mini (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Normikoko 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Perälauta 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Matkakoko 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Muu
sk-SK: Klasifikácia podľa veľkosti dosky: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Vlastné; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini stolové (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Normované 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Na batožinové dvere 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Cestovné 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Iné
da: Klassificering af brætstørrelser: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Tilpasset; Junior 2 fod × 1,5 fod (24 tommer × 18 tommer); Bordmodel, mini (4 tommer × 8 tommer – 10 tommer × 12 tommer); Standardmål 2 fod × 4 fod (24 tommer × 48 tommer); Bagklap 2 fod × 3 fod (24 tommer × 36 tommer); Rejse 1 fod × 2 fod (12 tommer × 24 tommer); Andet
tr: Board boyut sınıflandırması: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Özel; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini masaüstü (4 in × 8 in - 10 in × 12 in); Nizami 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Bagaj 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Seyahat 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Diğer
th: การจัดประเภทขนาดบอร์ด: 120 ซม. × 60 ซม.; 90 ซม. × 60 ซม.; กำหนดเอง; จูเนียร์ 2 ฟุต × 1.5 ฟุต (24 นิ้ว × 18 นิ้ว); มินิตั้งโต๊ะ (4 นิ้ว × 8 นิ้ว – 10 นิ้ว × 12 นิ้ว); มาตรฐาน 2 ฟุต × 4 ฟุต (24 นิ้ว × 48 นิ้ว); ท้ายรถ 2 ฟุต × 3 ฟุต (24 นิ้ว × 36 นิ้ว); พกพา 1 ฟุต × 2 ฟุต (12 นิ้ว × 24 นิ้ว); อื่นๆ
hu: Deszka méretbesorolása: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Egyedi; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini asztali (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Szabványos 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Csomagtérajtós 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Utazó 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Egyéb
zh-TW: 板材尺寸分類: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; 自訂; 兒童版 2 ft × 1.5 ft (24 in × 18 in); 迷你桌上版 (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); 標準版 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); 後車廂版 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); 旅行版 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); 其他
pl: Klasyfikacja rozmiaru deski: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Niestandardowy; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini na stół (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Przepisowy 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Podróżny 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Inne
nl: Boord grootte classificatie: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Aangepast; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini tafelmodel (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Officieel 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Laadklep 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Reismodel 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Overige
de: Klassifizierung der Boardgröße: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Benutzerdefiniert; Junior 2 ft × 1.5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini Tabletop (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Regulär 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Heckklappe 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Reise 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Sonstige
vi: Phân loại kích thước ván: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Tùy chỉnh; Cỡ nhỏ 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Cỡ nhỏ để bàn (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Tiêu chuẩn 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Cỡ dã ngoại 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Du lịch 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Khác
sl-SI: Klasifikacija velikosti deske: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Po meri; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini namizna (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Standardna 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Potovalna 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Drugo
pt-BR: Classificação do tamanho da placa: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Personalizado; Júnior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini de mesa (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Oficial 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Viagem 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Outros
cs: Klasifikace velikosti prkna: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Vlastní; Juniorská 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Stolní mini verze (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Standardní 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Cestovní větší 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Cestovní 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Jiné
pt-PT: Classificação do tamanho da placa: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Personalizado; Júnior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini de mesa (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Regulamentar 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Porta-bagagens 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Viagem 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Outro
en: Board size classification: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Custom; Junior 2 ft × 1.5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini tabletop (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Regulation 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Travel 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Other
fr: Classification de la taille de la planche: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Personnalisé; Junior 2 pi × 1,5 pi (24 po × 18 po); Mini de table (4 po × 8 po - 10 po × 12 po); Réglementaire 2 pi × 4 pi (24 po × 48 po); Hayon 2 pi × 3 pi (24 po × 36 po); Voyage 1 pi × 2 pi (12 po × 24 po); Autre
it: Classificazione per dimensione della tavola: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Personalizzato; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini da tavolo (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Regolamentare 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Da viaggio 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Altro
el: Ταξινόμηση μεγέθους σανίδας: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Προσαρμοσμένο; Παιδικό 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Μίνι επιτραπέζιο (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Προδιαγραφών 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Ταξιδιού 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Άλλο
bg-BG: Класификация на размера на дъската: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; По поръчка; Детска 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Мини настолна (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Стандартна 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); За багажник 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); За пътуване 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Друго
ro-RO: Clasificarea dimensiunii plăcii: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Personalizat; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Mini de masă (4 in × 8 in – 10 in × 12 in); Regulamentar 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); De călătorie 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Altele
lt-LT: Lentos dydžio klasifikacija: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Pasirinktinis; Jaunių, 2 pėd. × 1,5 pėd. (24 col. × 18 col.); Mini stalo, 4 col. × 8 col. – 10 col. × 12 col.; Standartinis, 2 pėd. × 4 pėd. (24 col. × 48 col.); Pramoginis, 2 pėd. × 3 pėd. (24 col. × 36 col.); Kelioninis, 1 pėd. × 2 pėd. (12 col. × 24 col.); Kitas
es: Clasificación del tamaño de la tabla: 120 cm × 60 cm; 90 cm × 60 cm; Personalizado; Junior 2 ft × 1,5 ft (24 in × 18 in); Minimesa (4 in × 8 in - 10 in × 12 in); Reglamentario 2 ft × 4 ft (24 in × 48 in); Tailgate 2 ft × 3 ft (24 in × 36 in); Viaje 1 ft × 2 ft (12 in × 24 in); Otro